Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-128.3 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board of
education of each school district in the state shall spend no less
than fifty percent (50%) of its annual budget on instructional
expenditures. "Instructional expenditures" means instruction
expenditures as defined by the National Center for Education
Statistics, a federal entity within the United States Department of
Education. If the National Center for Education Statistics ceases
Req. No. 15072 Page 1

to e xist, then instructional expenditures shall have the same
meaning as provided by an equivalent entity to the National Center
for Education Statistics. Instructional expenditures shall not
include administrative services as defined in Section 18-124 of this
title or for equipment or materials for administrative staff.
B. If a school district spends less than fifty percent (50%) of
its annual budget on instructional expenditures, the school district
shall not provide extracurricular activities for students during the
school day for the entirety of the school year that the noncompliant
annual budget applies to.
C. As used in this section, "annual budget" means a plan of
financial operations using revenues contributed from local, state,
and federal sources but shall not include revenue received from bond
sales, the sale of property or equipment, school fundraisers, or
nonprofit organization contributions or grants.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15072 SW 01/13/26


Req. No. 15072 Page 2